Maryland, session 2025, SB0722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
SUBTITLE 10. ECOLOGICAL RESTORATION.
1–1001.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “ECOLOGICAL RESTORATION” MEANS AN ACTIVITY
UNDERTAKEN WITH THE GOAL OF RECOVERING, RE–ESTABLISHING, OR ENHANCING
A DEGRADED, DAMAGED, OR DESTROYED ECOSYSTEM THROUGH:
(1) IMPROVEMENTS TO PHYSICAL, CHEMICAL, OR BIOLOGICAL
CHARACTERISTICS OR PROCESSES;
(2) RETURNING NATURAL OR HISTORICAL FUNCTIONS OR SERVICES;
OR
(3) PROTECTING OR IMPROVING RESILIENCY.
1–1002.
– 1 –

Ch. 329 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL UPDATE ANY RELEVANT REGULATION ADOPTED
UNDER THIS ARTICLE TO, AS APPROPRIATE:
(1) INCORPORATE THE DEFINITION OF ECOLOGICAL RESTORATION;
OR
(2) BE CONSISTENT WITH THE DEFINITION OF ECOLOGICAL
RESTORATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –